Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
PART 3
RELATIONS OF PARTNERS TO
PERSONS DEALING WITH PARTNERSHIP

7-64-301. Partner agent of partnership.

Subject to the effect of a statement of partnership authority under section 7-64-303:

Each partner is an agent of the partnership for the purposes of its business. An act of a partner, including the execution of an instrument in the partnership name, for apparently carrying on in the ordinary course the partnership business or business of the kind carried on by the partnership binds the partnership, unless the partner had no authority to act for the partnership in the particular matter and the person with whom the partner was dealing had notice that the partner lacked authority.

An act of a partner which is not apparently for carrying on in the ordinary course the partnership business or business of the kind carried on by the partnership binds the partnership only if the act was authorized by the other partners.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 874, § 1, effective January 1, 1998.

7-64-302. Transfer of partnership property.

Partnership property may be transferred as follows:

Subject to the effect of a statement of partnership authority under section 7-64-303, partnership property held in the name of the partnership may be transferred by an instrument of transfer executed by a partner in the partnership name.

Partnership property held in the name of one or more partners with an indication in the instrument transferring the property to them of their capacity as partners or of the existence of a partnership, but without an indication of the name of the partnership, may be transferred by an instrument of transfer executed by the persons in whose name the property is held.

Partnership property held in the name of one or more persons other than the partnership, without an indication in the instrument transferring the property to them of their capacity as partners or of the existence of a partnership, may be transferred by an instrument of transfer executed by the persons in whose name the property is held.

A partnership may recover partnership property from a transferee only if it proves that execution of the instrument of initial transfer did not bind the partnership under section 7-64-301 and:

As to a subsequent transferee who gave value for property transferred under paragraph (a) or (b) of subsection (1) of this section, proves that the subsequent transferee had notice that the person who executed the instrument of initial transfer lacked authority to bind the partnership; or

As to a transferee who gave value for property transferred under paragraph (c) of subsection (1) of this section, proves that the transferee had notice that the property was partnership property and that the person who executed the instrument of initial transfer lacked authority to bind the partnership.

A partnership may not recover partnership property from a subsequent transferee if the partnership would not have been entitled to recover the property, under subsection (2) of this section, from any earlier transferee of the property.

If a person holds all of the partners' interests in the partnership, all of the partnership property vests in that person. The person may execute a document in the name of the partnership to evidence vesting of the property in that person and may file or record the document.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 875, § 1, effective January 1, 1998.

7-64-303. Statement of partnership authority.

A partnership may deliver to the secretary of state, for filing pursuant to part 3 of article 90 of this title, a statement of partnership authority, which statement shall include:

The true name of the partnership;

The principal office address of its principal office, if any, or, if it has no principal office, the street address, and, if different, the mailing address, of its chief executive office, and, in either case, the street address, and, if different, the mailing address, of one office in this state, if there is one; and

The true names or a description of the partners as to which the partnership makes a statement of partnership authority to execute an instrument transferring real property held in the name of the partnership or to enter into other transactions on behalf of the partnership and the authority, or limitations on authority, of such partners, which authority and limitations may vary among such partners as such variations are stated in the statement of partnership authority.

If a filed statement of partnership authority states the true name of the partnership but does not contain all of the other information required by subsection (1) of this section, the statement nevertheless operates with respect to a person not a partner as provided in subsections (3) and (4) of this section.

A filed statement of partnership authority is prima facie evidence of the existence of the partnership and of the facts stated therein and supplements the authority of a partner to enter into transactions on behalf of the partnership as follows:

Except for transfers of real property, a grant of authority contained in a filed statement of partnership authority is conclusive in favor of a person who gives value without notice to the contrary, so long as and to the extent that a limitation on that authority is not then contained in that or another filed statement. A filed cancellation of a limitation on authority revives the previous grant of authority.

A grant of authority to transfer real property held in the true name of the partnership, contained in a copy of a filed statement of partnership authority recorded in the office for recording transfers of that real property, is conclusive in favor of a person who gives value without having notice to the contrary, so long as and to the extent that a copy of a filed statement containing a limitation on that authority is not then of record in the office for recording transfers of that real property. The recording in the office for recording transfers of that real property of a copy of a filed statement canceling a limitation on authority revives the previous grant of authority.

A person not a partner has notice of a limitation on the authority of a partner to transfer real property held in the true name of the partnership if a copy of a filed statement containing the limitation on authority is of record in the office for recording transfers of that real property.

Except as otherwise provided in subsections (3) and (4) of this section and in sections 7-64-704 (3) and 7-64-805 (3), a person not a partner does not have notice of a limitation on the authority of a partner merely because the limitation is contained in a filed statement.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 876, § 1, effective January 1, 1998.

L. 2000:

(1)(a)(I), (3), (4)(b), and (5) amended, p. 955, § 30, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

IP(1) amended, p. 1826, § 54, effective July 1; IP(1) amended, p. 1690, § 52, effective October 1.

L. 2003:

(1)(a)(I), (1)(a)(II), (3), (4)(b), and (5) amended, p. 2252, § 153, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 1449, § 156, effective July 1.

7-64-304. Statement of denial.

A partner or other person named as a partner in a filed statement of partnership authority may deliver to the secretary of state, for filing pursuant to part 3 of article 90 of this title, a statement of denial stating the true name of the partnership and the fact that is being denied, which may include denial of a person's authority or status as a partner. A statement of denial is a limitation on authority as provided in section 7-64-303 (3) and (4).

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 877, § 1, effective January 1, 1998.

L. 2000:

Entire section amended, p. 955, § 31, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, 1826, § 55, effective July 1; entire section amended, p. 1690, § 53, effective October 1.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 2253, § 154, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 1451, § 157, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

Entire section amended, p. 851, § 11, effective July 1.

7-64-305. Partnership liable for partner's actionable conduct.

A partnership is liable for loss or injury caused to a person, or for a penalty incurred, as a result of a wrongful act or omission, or other actionable conduct, of a partner acting in the ordinary course of business of the partnership or with authority of the partnership.

If, in the course of the partnership's business or while acting with authority of the partnership, a partner receives or causes the partnership to receive money or property of a person not a partner, and the money or property is misapplied by a partner, the partnership is liable for the loss.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 877, § 1, effective January 1, 1998.

7-64-306. Partner's liability.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, all partners are liable jointly and severally for all partnership obligations unless otherwise agreed by the claimant or provided by law.

A person admitted as a partner into an existing partnership is not personally liable for any partnership obligations incurred before the person's admission as a partner.

Except as otherwise provided in a written partnership agreement, a person is not, solely by reason of being a partner, liable, directly or indirectly, including by way of indemnification, contribution, assessment, or otherwise, for partnership obligations which are incurred, created, or assumed by the partnership while the partnership is a limited liability partnership.

A partner in a limited liability partnership does not become liable, directly or indirectly, for partnership obligations incurred, created, or assumed while the partnership was a limited liability partnership merely because the partnership ceases to be a limited liability partnership.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 877, § 1, effective January 1, 1998.

7-64-307. Actions by and against partnership and partners.

A partnership may sue and be sued in the name of the partnership.

An action may be brought against the partnership and any or all of the partners in the same action or in separate actions.

A judgment against a partnership is not by itself a judgment against a partner. A judgment against a partnership may not be satisfied from the assets of a partner liable as provided in section 7-64-306 for the partnership obligation unless there is also a judgment against the partner for such obligation.

A judgment creditor of a partner may not levy execution against the assets of the partner to satisfy a judgment based on a claim against the partnership unless:

The claim is for a partnership obligation for which the partner is liable as provided in section 7-64-306 and either:

A judgment based on the same claim has been obtained against the partnership and a writ of execution on the judgment has been returned unsatisfied in whole or in part;

The partnership is a debtor in bankruptcy;

The partner has agreed that the creditor need not exhaust partnership assets; or

A court grants permission to the judgment creditor to levy execution against the assets of a partner based on a finding that partnership assets subject to execution are clearly insufficient to satisfy the judgment, that exhaustion of partnership assets is excessively burdensome, or that the grant of permission is an appropriate exercise of the court's equitable powers; or

Liability is imposed on the partner by law or contract independent of the existence of the partnership.

This section applies to any partnership obligation resulting from a representation by a partner or purported partner under section 7-64-308.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 878, § 1, effective January 1, 1998.

L. 2003:

(1) amended, p. 2253, § 155, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

(1) amended, p. 1451, § 158, effective July 1.

7-64-308. Liability of purported partner.

If a person, by words or conduct, purports to be a partner, or consents to being represented by another as a partner, in a partnership or with one or more persons not partners, the purported partner is liable to a person to whom the representation is made, if that person, relying on the representation, enters into a transaction with the actual or purported partnership. If the representation, either by the purported partner or by a person with the purported partner's consent, is made in a public manner, the purported partner is liable to a person who relies upon the purported partnership even if the purported partner is not aware of being held out as a partner to the claimant. If a partnership obligation results, the purported partner is liable with respect to that obligation as if the purported partner were a partner in the partnership, and, if the partnership is a limited liability partnership, the purported partner's liability is subject to section 7-64-306 as if the purported partner were a partner in the limited liability partnership. If no partnership obligation results, the purported partner is liable with respect to that liability jointly and severally with any other person consenting to the representation.

If a person is thus represented to be a partner in an existing partnership, or with one or more persons not partners, the purported partner is an agent of persons consenting to the representation to bind them to the same extent and in the same manner as if the purported partner were a partner, with respect to persons who enter into transactions in reliance upon the representation. If all of the partners of the existing partnership consent to the representation, a partnership act or partnership obligation results. If fewer than all of the partners of the existing partnership consent to the representation, the person acting and the partners consenting to the representation are jointly and severally liable.

A person is not liable as a partner merely because the person is named by another in a statement of partnership authority.

A person does not continue to be liable as a partner merely because of a failure to deliver to the secretary of state for filing a statement of dissociation or an amendment of a statement of partnership authority to indicate the partner's dissociation from the partnership.

Except as otherwise provided in subsections (1) and (2) of this section, persons who are not partners as to each other are not liable as partners to other persons.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 879, § 1, effective January 1, 1998.

L. 2004:

(1) amended, p. 1451, § 159, effective July 1.